Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.070

Conduct of election.

The election shall be conducted as other elections are required by law to be conducted in the city or town except as in this chapter otherwise provided.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.070. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 5; RRS s 8918.]

NOTES:

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.